Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1211
Responsibility
for cost of services.

A person receiving specialized
services from a local specialized program which receives financial assistance
through the department shall be responsible for the cost of such services
in the same manner as are persons receiving services at the Beatrice State
Developmental Center. Provisions of law in effect on September 6, 1991, or
enacted after such date relating to the responsibility of such persons and
their relatives for the cost of and determination of ability to pay for services
at the center shall also apply to persons receiving services from specialized
programs.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 41.

A service recipient's liability for costs shall not be determined based on a finding of whether such costs are fair and reasonable. In re Guardianship of Gaube, 14 Neb. App. 259, 707 N.W.2d 16 (2005).